Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8022. TANGLEWOOD FOREST LIMITED DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8022.0001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Tanglewood Forest Limited District.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. FINANCIAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8022.0051. USE OF GENERAL OPERATING FUNDS. Notwithstanding Section 54.236, Water Code, the district may use general operating funds to install, operate, and maintain street or security lighting in an area in the district:

(1) that has had water utilities and streets installed for not less than eight years; and

(2) in which the developer of the area has not installed street or security lighting as required as a condition of the municipality's granting its consent to the creation of the district under Section 54.016, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 468 (H.B. 4172), Sec. 1.02, eff. April 1, 2021.